Massachusetts, session 194th, H1054.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1: Chapter 132A Section 2D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words "Purple Heart recipient" in line
17, the following words:-, a veteran
of 1